Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.001, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Board of Barber Examiners. (a) A Board of Barber Examiners is established to consist of four barber members and one public member, as defined in section 214.02, appointed by the governor. (b) The barber members shall be persons who have practiced as registered barbers in this state for at least five years immediately prior to their appointment; shall be graduates from the 12th grade of a high school or have equivalent education, and shall have knowledge of the matters to be taught in registered barber schools, as set forth in section 154.07. deleted text begin One of the barber members shall be a member of, or recommended by, a union of journeymen barbers that has existed at least two years, and one barber member shall be a member of, or recommended by, a professional organization of barbers.deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.003, is amended to read: 154.003 FEES. (a) The fees collected, as required in this chapter, chapter 214, and the rules of the board, shall be paid to the board. The board shall deposit the fees in the general fund in the state treasury. (b) The board shall charge the following fees: (1) new text begin practical new text end examination deleted text begin and certificatedeleted text end , registered barber, deleted text begin $85deleted text end new text begin $80new text end ; deleted text begin (2) retake of written examination, $10; deleted text end new text begin (2) initial barber registration, $80; new text end (3) examination and certificate, instructor, $180; (4) certificate, instructor, $65; (5) temporary teacher permit, $80; (6) temporary registered barber, military, $85; (7) temporary barber instructor, military, $180; (8) renewal of registration, registered barber, $80; (9) renewal of registration, instructor, $80; (10) renewal of temporary teacher permit, $65; (11) student permit, $45; (12) renewal of student permit, $25; (13) initial shop registration, $85; (14) initial school registration, $1,030; (15) renewal shop registration, $85; (16) renewal school registration, $280; (17) restoration of registered barber registration, $95; (18) restoration of shop registration, $105; (19) change of ownership or location, $55; (20) duplicate registration, $40; (21) home study course, $75; (22) letter of registration verification, $25; and (23) reinspection, $100. new text begin (c) If the board uses a board-approved examination provider for any portion of the comprehensive registered barber examination and the provider charges a fee, an examinee must pay the fee directly to the provider. A fee charged by a provider under this paragraph is separate from and not included in the fees that an examinee pays to the board. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.01, is amended to read: 154.01 REGISTRATION MANDATORY. (a) The registration of the practice of barbering serves the public health and safety of the people of the state of Minnesota by ensuring that individuals seeking to practice the profession of barbering are appropriately trained in the use of the chemicals, tools, and implements of barbering and demonstrate the skills necessary to conduct barber services in a safe, sanitary, and appropriate environment required for infection control. (b) No person shall practice, offer to practice, or attempt to practice barbering without a current certificate of registration as a registered barber, issued deleted text begin pursuant to provisions of sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end by the Board of Barber Examiners. (c) A registered barber must only provide barbering services in a registered barber shop or barber school, unless prior authorization is given by the board. (d) No person shall operate a barber shop unless it is at all times under the direct supervision and management of a registered barber and the owner or operator of the barber shop possesses a current shop registration card, issued to the barber shop establishment addressdeleted text begin , under sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end by the Board of Barber Examiners. (e) No person shall serve, offer to serve, or attempt to serve as an instructor of barbering without a current certificate of registration as a registered instructor of barbering or a temporary permit as an instructor of barbering, as provided for the board by rule, issued deleted text begin under sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end by the Board of Barber Examiners. Barber instruction must be provided in registered barber schools only. (f) No person shall operate a barber school unless the owner or operator possesses a current certificate of registration as a barber school, issued deleted text begin under sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end by the Board of Barber Examiners. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. What constitutes barbering. Any one or any combination of the following practices when done upon the head, face, and neck for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments and when done for payment directly or indirectly or without payment for the public generally constitutes the practice of barbering within the meaning of deleted text begin sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end : to shave the face or necknew text begin using a straight razor or other toolnew text end , trim the beard, clean, condition, cut, color, shape, or straighten the hair of any person of either sex for compensation or other reward received by the person performing such service or any other person; to give facial and scalp massage with oils, creams, lotions, or other preparations either by hand or mechanical appliances; to singe, shampoo the hair, or apply hair tonics; or to apply cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays, or lotions to hair, scalp, face, or neck.new text begin The removal of hair through the process of waxing is not barbering.new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Certificate of registration. A "certificate of registration" means the certificate issued to an individual, new text begin a new text end barber shop, or new text begin a new text end barber school that is in compliance with deleted text begin the requirements of sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Straight razor. new text end new text begin A straight razor is a razor with a rigid steel cutting blade or a replaceable blade that is hinged to a case that forms a handle when the razor is open for use. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Waxing. new text end new text begin Waxing is the process of removing hair from a part of the body by applying wax and peeling off the wax. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.05, is amended to read: 154.05 WHO MAY RECEIVE CERTIFICATES OF REGISTRATION AS A REGISTERED BARBER. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end A person is qualified to receive a certificate of registration as a registered barber if the person: (1) deleted text begin has successfully completed ten grades of educationdeleted text end new text begin is at least 17 years of agenew text end ; (2) has successfully completed 1,500 hours of study new text begin of which 281 hours are classroom hours and 1,219 hours are practical hours new text end in a board-approved barber school; and (3) has passed deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a comprehensivenew text end examination deleted text begin conducted by the boarddeleted text end new text begin in accordance with section 154.09new text end to determine new text begin the person's new text end fitness to practice barbering. deleted text begin (b) A first-time applicant for a certificate of registration to practice as a registered barber who fails to pass the comprehensive examination conducted by the board and who fails to pass a onetime retake of the written examination, shall complete an additional 500 hours of barber education before being eligible to retake the comprehensive examination as many times as necessary to pass. deleted text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Admission requirements; course of instruction. No barber school shall be approved by the board unless deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the barber schoolnew text end requires, deleted text begin as a prerequisite to admission, ten grades of an approved school or its equivalent, as determined by educational transcript, high school diploma, high school equivalency certificate, or an examination conducted by the commissioner of education, which shall issue a certificate that the student has passed the required examination, and unless it requires,deleted text end as a prerequisite to graduation, a course of instruction of at least 1,500 hours of not more than ten hours of schooling in any one working day. The course of instruction must include the following subjects: scientific fundamentals for barbering; hygiene; practical study of the hair, skin, muscles, and nerves; structure of the head, face, and neck; elementary chemistry relating to sanitation; disinfection; sterilization and antiseptics; diseases of the skin, hair, and glands; massaging and manipulating the muscles of the face and neck; haircutting; shaving; trimming the beard; bleaching, tinting and dyeing the hair; and the chemical waving and straightening of hair. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Application review process. new text end new text begin (a) Upon receipt of an application to establish a barber school, the board must consider the application during a meeting that is open to the public. At the meeting, the applicant must demonstrate that: new text end new text begin (1) the contents of the application are true, as required by chapter 154 and the rules of the board; and new text end new text begin (2) the applicant has sufficient financial resources to fund the barber school. new text end new text begin (b) The board may deny an application if the board determines that the applicant's financial resources would be insufficient to: new text end new text begin (1) maintain and operate a barber school; and new text end new text begin (2) ensure that the barber school would be open long enough for all registered students to graduate from the barber school. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.08, is amended to read: 154.08 APPLICATION; FEE. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application and fee requirements. new text end Each applicant for an examination shall: (1) make new text begin an new text end application to the Board of Barber Examiners new text begin or a board-approved examination provider new text end on blank forms prepared and furnished by deleted text begin it, the application todeleted text end new text begin the board or the board-approved provider. The application mustnew text end contain proof under the applicant's oath of the particular qualifications and identity of the applicant; (2) provide all documentation required in support of the application; (3) pay to the board the required fee; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) upon acceptance of the notarized applicationnew text begin ,new text end present a corresponding government-issued photo identification when the applicant appears for new text begin the new text end examinationdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) file an application with the board no later than the twentieth day of the month preceding the month when the practical portion of the exam is administered. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.09, is amended to read: 154.09 EXAMINATIONS, CONDUCT AND SCOPE. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Examination dates. new text end The board new text begin or a board-approved examination provider new text end shall conduct new text begin practical new text end examinations of applicants for certificates of registration to practice as registered barbers not more than deleted text begin sixdeleted text end new text begin eightnew text end times each year, at such time and place as the board may determine. deleted text begin Additionaldeleted text end Written examinations may be scheduled deleted text begin by the boarddeleted text end and conducted by board staff new text begin or a board-approved provider new text end as designated by the board. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Documentation required. new text end The deleted text begin proprietordeleted text end new text begin owner or operatornew text end of a barber school must file an affidavit with the board of hours completed by students applying to take the deleted text begin registered barberdeleted text end new text begin comprehensivenew text end examination. Students must complete the full 1,500-hour curriculum in a barber school approved by the board deleted text begin within the past four yearsdeleted text end to be eligible for new text begin the new text end examination. deleted text begin Barber students who have completed barber school more than four years prior to application, that have not obtained a barber registration, license, or certificate in any jurisdiction must complete an additional 500 hours of barber school education to be eligible for the registered barber examination.deleted text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Examinations for registration restoration. new text end deleted text begin Registered barbers that faildeleted text end new text begin An individual who failsnew text end to renew deleted text begin theirdeleted text end new text begin the individual's barbernew text end registration for four or more years deleted text begin aredeleted text end new text begin isnew text end required to new text begin purchase and complete the "Home Study Course for Barbers" program that was prepared and approved by the board before the individual is eligible to apply to new text end take the deleted text begin registered barberdeleted text end new text begin comprehensivenew text end examination to reinstate the new text begin individual's new text end registration. new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Examinations for individuals seeking reciprocity. new text end new text begin An individual who must pass the comprehensive examination under section 154.11 must purchase and complete the "Home Study Course for Barbers" program that was prepared and approved by the board before the individual is eligible to take the comprehensive examination. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contents of examination. new text end The new text begin comprehensive new text end examination deleted text begin of applicants for certificates of registration as barbers shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end includenew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a practical deleted text begin demonstrationdeleted text end new text begin portion that consists of: a haircut and three of the following practical services that the board shall determine: a shave, a beard trim, a shampoo, a perm wrap, a facial, or a color application;new text end and new text begin (2)new text end a written deleted text begin test. The examination must coverdeleted text end new text begin portion that coversnew text end the subjects taught in barber schools deleted text begin registered with the board, includingdeleted text end new text begin as required by this chapter,new text end applicable state deleted text begin statutedeleted text end new text begin statutes,new text end and deleted text begin ruledeleted text end new text begin rulesnew text end . new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Examination grading. new text end new text begin The comprehensive examination must be graded as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the grading for the practical portion of the examination must be on a scale of one to 100, with 100 representing a perfect score. A score of 75 must be the minimum passing grade for the haircut portion and 75 must be the minimum passing score for the average of the remaining parts of the practical examination; and new text end new text begin (2) the minimum passing score for the written portion of the examination is 75 percent. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Failure of examination. new text end new text begin (a) An individual who does not pass one portion of the comprehensive examination within a year of passing the other portion of the comprehensive examination must retake the entire comprehensive examination. new text end new text begin (b) An individual who has failed a portion of the comprehensive examination may retake that portion of the examination within a year of passing the other portion after meeting the requirements of this chapter, paying any required fees, and making an application to the board as required by section 154.08. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Examination of nonresidents. (a) A person who meets all of the requirements for barber registration in deleted text begin sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end and either has a currently active license, certificate of registration, or equivalent as a practicing barber or instructor of barbering as verified from another state or, if presenting foreign country credentials as verified by a board-approved professional credential evaluation provider, which in the discretion of the board has substantially the same requirements for registering barbers and instructors of barbering as required deleted text begin by sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin in this chapternew text end shall, upon payment of the required fee, be issued a certificate of registration without examination. (b) Individuals without a current documented license, certificate of registration, or equivalent, as verified in paragraph (a), must have a minimum of 1,500 hours of barber education as verified by the barber school attended in the other state or if presenting foreign country education as verified by a board-approved professional credential evaluation provider, completed within the previous four years, which, in the discretion of the board, has substantially the same requirements as required in deleted text begin sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end will be eligible for examination. (c) Individuals unable to meet the requirements in paragraph (a) or (b) shall be subject to all the requirements of section 154.05. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Examination of cosmetologists. new text end new text begin (a) A person may be credited with up to 1,000 hours of study toward the 1,500 hours of study required under section 154.05 if the person: new text end new text begin (1) has hours of study that the board determines are substantially similar to the requirements in section 154.07; new text end new text begin (2) has a currently active license verified by the issuing state or a certificate of registration verified by the issuing state, or equivalent, as a practicing cosmetologist; or new text end new text begin (3) has credentials as a practicing cosmetologist from a foreign country that are verified by a board-approved professional credential evaluation provider and the board has determined that the foreign country's curriculum requirements are substantially similar to the requirements in section 154.07. new text end new text begin (b) After a person with credited hours under paragraph (a) completes the remaining required hours in a board-approved barber school and meets the requirements of section 154.05, clause (1), the person is eligible for the comprehensive examination. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, parts 2100.2500; 2100.2600; 2100.2900; 2100.3000; 2100.3200; 2100.3300; 2100.4500; 2100.5200, subparts 1, 2, and 5; 2100.5300; and 2100.6000, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Rule: 26-06008 2100.2500 EXAMINATION DATES. Examinations for a certificate as a registered barber shall be held in the second week of February, May, August, and November of each year. Notice of the examination shall be given during the first week of the month preceding the month in which the examination is to be held. Two additional examinations may be held when the board determines it is cost efficient. 2100.2600 APPLICATION FOR EXAMINATION. An applicant for examination as a registered barber shall file an application for examination on forms furnished by the board. This application must be filed with the board no later than the 20th day of the month preceding the month in which the examination is to be given; provided, however, that the board shall, upon the showing of a hardship, accept applications at a later date. Applicants for registered barber status must complete the program entitled "Home Study Course for Barbers" prepared or approved by the Board of Barber Examiners before the examination may be taken. 2100.2900 CONTENTS OF EXAMINATION. An examination consists of five parts: a written examination and four practical services. The type of haircut, shave or beard trim, and two of the following practical services: shampoo, perm wrap, facial, or color application, will be determined at the discretion of the board. 2100.3000 GRADING OF EXAMINATION. The registered barber examinations given pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 154.09, shall be graded as follows: The grading criteria for the written part of the examination and the passing grade will be established for each written examination at the time of its preparation; however, the lowest passing grade established shall never be less than 55. The grading for the practical performances part of the examination will be on a scale of 1 to 100 with 100 representing a perfect score. A score of 75 will be the minimum passing grade for the haircut portion, and 75 will also be the minimum passing score for the average of the remaining parts of the practical performances. If an applicant does not receive at least the established minimum passing grade on the written portion of the examination, or at least a grade of 75 on the haircut portion of the examination, or score an average of at least 75 on the remaining parts of the practical examination, the applicant will have failed the examination, and may only retake the examination after paying the necessary fee and meeting the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 154.05. 2100.3200 FAILURE OF EXAMINATION. An individual who has not held a Minnesota barber registration prior to examination and who fails the examination and onetime written retake, if applicable, shall complete an additional 500 hours of barber school to be eligible to retake the examination as many times as necessary to pass. An individual who has previously held a Minnesota barber registration as an apprentice or registered barber may take the examination as many times as necessary to reinstate the registration without additional barber school hours. 2100.3300 FAILURE TO RENEW CERTIFICATE WITHIN FOUR YEARS. A registered barber who has failed to renew the certificate of registration for four years or more from the date of expiration must complete the current program entitled "Home Study Course for Barbers" prepared or approved by the Board of Barber Examiners and take and pass the registered barber examination before a certificate of registration may be issued. Home Study Course for Barbers is required prior to examination for all examinees. 2100.4500 INSTRUCTOR REGISTRATION QUALIFICATION. To qualify for an instructor's examination, an applicant must be a registered barber with three years' experience. 2100.5200 CONSIDERATIONS IN REGISTRATION ISSUANCE. § Subpart 1. Factors. Upon receipt of an application for establishment of a barber school, the board shall give consideration to the factors in subparts 2 and 5. § Subp. 2. Public welfare. The board shall give consideration to any detriment to the public welfare and the need for barber school facilities in the community and neighborhood where the proposed barber school is to be located, giving particular consideration to: § A. the economic character of the community and neighborhood; § B. the effect on existing barber shops and barber schools in the community; § C. the availability of adequate support for the proposed barber school in the community and neighborhood with particular regard to adequate practice for students; § D. the extent to which the proposed barber school would draw patrons from adjacent communities or neighborhoods and the character thereof; and § E. the effect of the establishment of a barber school on the social and economic aspects of the community and neighborhood and adjacent communities and neighborhoods in regard to the proposed site. § Subp. 5. Student-registered instructor ratio. There must be at least one instructor for every 17 students enrolled. 2100.5300 PUBLIC HEARING ON REGISTRATION APPLICATION. Upon receipt of an application for the establishment of a barber school, the board shall conduct a public hearing in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, chapter 14, and rules promulgated thereunder. The applicant shall show at such hearing, by competent evidence, the factual basis of the assertions of the application and the applicant's qualifications as required by Minnesota Statutes, chapter 154, and the rules of the board. The applicant shall further show financial qualifications and it shall be a sufficient reason for denial of the application that the board considers the financial resources of the applicant to be insufficient to maintain and operate a barber school and assure the graduation of students who are registered in such school and have paid their tuition. 2100.6000 HOURS OF INSTRUCTION. Each student, including each part-time student, must complete at least 281 classroom hours and 1,219 practical hours in the required 1,500-hour course.